ru: Тип монтажной планки: Ласточкин хвост 11 мм; Ласточкин хвост 20 мм; KeyMod; M-LOK; Без планки (прямое крепление); Пикатинни; Вивер; Другое
lt-LT: Montavimo bėgelio tipas: 11 mm „Dovetail“; 20 mm „Dovetail“; KeyMod; M-LOK; Be bėgelio (tiesioginis tvirtinimas); Picatinny; Weaver; Kita
pl: Typ szyny montażowej: Jaskółczy ogon 11 mm; Jaskółczy ogon 20 mm; KeyMod; M-LOK; Brak szyny (montaż bezpośredni); Picatinny; Weaver; Inne
el: Τύπος ράγας στήριξης: Dovetail 11 mm; Dovetail 20 mm; KeyMod; M-LOK; Χωρίς ράγα (απευθείας τοποθέτηση); Picatinny; Weaver; Άλλο
en: Mounting rail type: 11 mm Dovetail; 20 mm Dovetail; KeyMod; M-LOK; No rail (direct mount); Picatinny; Weaver; Other
fi: Asennuskiskon tyyppi: 11 mm lohenpyrstö; 20 mm lohenpyrstö; KeyMod; M-LOK; Ei kiskoa (suora kiinnitys); Picatinny; Weaver; Muu
bg-BG: Тип монтажна релса: 11 мм лястовича опашка; 20 мм лястовича опашка; KeyMod; M-LOK; Без релса (директен монтаж); Picatinny; Weaver; Друго
zh-TW: 安裝導軌類型: 11 mm 燕尾槽; 20 mm 燕尾槽; KeyMod; M-LOK; 無導軌 (直接安裝); 皮卡汀尼; Weaver; 其他
vi: Loại thanh ray lắp đặt: Ngàm đuôi én 11 mm; Ngàm đuôi én 20 mm; KeyMod; M-LOK; Không ray (gắn trực tiếp); Picatinny; Weaver; Khác
fr: Type de rail de montage: Queue d'aronde 11 mm; Queue d'aronde 20 mm; KeyMod; M-LOK; Aucun rail (montage direct); Picatinny; Weaver; Autre
tr: Montaj rayı tipi: 11 mm Kırlangıç kuyruğu; 20 mm Kırlangıç kuyruğu; KeyMod; M-LOK; Ray yok (doğrudan montaj); Picatinny; Weaver; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de trilho de montagem: Rabo de andorinha de 11 mm; Rabo de andorinha de 20 mm; KeyMod; M-LOK; Sem trilho (montagem direta); Picatinny; Weaver; Outros
it: Tipo di guida di montaggio: A coda di rondine da 11 mm; A coda di rondine da 20 mm; KeyMod; M-LOK; Senza binario (montaggio diretto); Picatinny; Weaver; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta montažne tračnice: 11 mm lastovičji rep; 20 mm lastovičji rep; KeyMod; M-LOK; Brez tirnice (neposredna pritrditev); Picatinny; Weaver; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta montažne šine: Lastin rep od 11 mm; Lastin rep od 20 mm; KeyMod; M-LOK; Bez vodilice (izravna montaža); Picatinny; Weaver; Ostalo
ja: 取り付けレールタイプ: 11mmダブテール; 20mmダブテール; KeyMod; M-LOK; レールなし (ダイレクトマウント); ピカティニー; ウィーバー; その他
ko: 장착 레일 유형: 11mm 도브테일; 20mm 도브테일; KeyMod; M-LOK; 레일 없음(다이렉트 마운트); 피카티니; 위버; 기타
da: Monteringsskinnetype: 11 mm svalehale; 20 mm svalehale; KeyMod; M-LOK; Ingen skinne (direkte montering); Picatinny; Weaver; Andet
ro-RO: Tipul șinei de montare: Dovetail 11 mm; Dovetail 20 mm; KeyMod; M-LOK; Fără șină (montare directă); Picatinny; Weaver; Altele
nb: Type monteringsskinne: 11 mm svalehale; 20 mm svalehale; KeyMod; M-LOK; Ingen skinne (direkte montering); Picatinny; Weaver; Annet
sk-SK: Typ montážnej lišty: 11 mm rybinová lišta; 20 mm rybinová lišta; KeyMod; M-LOK; Bez lišty (priama montáž); Picatinny; Weaver; Iné
sv: Monteringsskenatyp: 11 mm kilspår; 20 mm kilspår; KeyMod; M-LOK; Ingen skena (direktmontering); Picatinny; Weaver; Övrigt
hu: Szerelősín típusa: 11 mm-es fecskefarkas; 20 mm-es fecskefarkas; KeyMod; M-LOK; Sín nélkül (közvetlen rögzítés); Picatinny; Weaver; Egyéb
es: Tipo de riel de montaje: Cola de milano de 11 mm; Cola de milano de 20 mm; KeyMod; M-LOK; Sin riel (montaje directo); Picatinny; Weaver; Otro
de: Typ der Montageschiene: 11 mm Schwalbenschwanz; 20 mm Schwalbenschwanz; KeyMod; M-LOK; Keine Schiene (Direktmontage); Picatinny; Weaver; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de calha de montagem: Cauda de andorinha de 11 mm; Cauda de andorinha de 20 mm; KeyMod; M-LOK; Sem calha (montagem direta); Picatinny; Weaver; Outro
nl: Montagerail type: 11 mm Zwaluwstaart; 20 mm Zwaluwstaart; KeyMod; M-LOK; Geen rail (directe montage); Picatinny; Weaver; Overig
th: ประเภทรางยึด: หางเหยี่ยว 11 มม.; หางเหยี่ยว 20 มม.; KeyMod; M-LOK; ไม่มีราง (ติดตั้งโดยตรง); พิคาตินนี; วีเวอร์; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ montážní lišty: Rybinová drážka 11 mm; Rybinová drážka 20 mm; KeyMod; M-LOK; Bez lišty (přímá montáž); Picatinny; Weaver; Jiná
zh-CN: 安装导轨类型: 11 毫米燕尾槽; 20 毫米燕尾槽; KeyMod; M-LOK; 无导轨（直接安装）; 皮卡汀尼; 韦弗; 其他